Massachusetts, session 194th, H3203.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Paragraph (a) of Part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in 
the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by adding the following subparagraph:- 
(17)  The amount equal to the amount of a purchase of a gun safe; provided however, that 
such deduction shall not exceed $2,000 for a single person, for a married person filing a separate 
return of a head of household, or a married couple filing a joint return.